Massachusetts, session 194th, S1658.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 22C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 51 the 
following section:- 
Section 51A. The colonel may appoint as special state police officers retired uniformed 
members who, as the colonel deems necessary, may perform police details or any police duties 
arising therefrom during the course of police detail work, whether or not related to the detail 
work. 
Retired uniformed members appointed under this section shall: 
(i) have a state police discharge status of honorable; 

of 2 9  (ii) be deemed necessary, suitable, qualified and fit to perform the same essential 
functions and duties as uniformed members of the department; 
(iii) be certified by the police officer standards and training commission pursuant to 
section 4 of chapter 6E; 
(iv) be subject to or exempt from department rules as determined by the colonel; 
(v) be equipped, trained and deployed as determined by the colonel 
Retired uniformed members appointed shall, in accordance with sections 91 and 91A of 
chapter 32, be at-will employees subject to appointment and removal by the colonel in a manner 
consistent with sections 52 and 53 of this chapter and shall be appointed for a term of 1 year 
subject to renewal in the colonel's sole discretion. Such retired uniformed members shall not be 
subject to the civil service law or rules, shall not be entitled to any benefits of such law or rules, 
but shall, in the performance of assigned duties and for the purposes of section 9A of chapter 
258, be deemed a member of the state police.